Hawaii statutes.
§602-11 Rules. The supreme court shall
have power to promulgate rules in all civil and criminal cases for all courts
relating to process, practices, procedure and appeals, which shall have the
force and effect of law. Such rules shall not abridge, enlarge, or modify the
substantive rights of any litigant, nor the jurisdiction of any of the courts,
nor affect any statute of limitations.

Whenever in a statute it is provided that the
statute is applicable "except as otherwise provided," or words to
that effect, these words shall be deemed to refer to provisions of the rules of
court as well as other statutory provisions. [L 1939, c 215, §1; RL 1945,
§9614; RL 1955, §214-14; HRS §602-21; am L 1972, c 88, §2(g); ren L 1979, c
111, pt of §2]

Cross References

Constitutional provision, see Const. art. VI, §7.

Rules of Court

See Rules of the Supreme Court; Hawaii Rules of Professional
Conduct; Hawaii Revised Code of Judicial Conduct; Hawaii Rules of Appellate
Procedure; Rules of the Intermediate Court of Appeals; Hawaii Rules of Civil
Procedure; Hawaii Rules of Penal Procedure; Rules of the Circuit Courts; Hawaii
Arbitration Rules; Rules of the District Courts; District Court Rules of Civil
Procedure; Rules of the Small Claims Division; Rules of the Family Court; Rules
of the Tax Appeal Court; Rules of the Land Court; Hawaii Civil Traffic Rules;
Hawaii Probate Rules; Rules Governing Court Reporting; Hawaii Court Records
Rules; Hawaii Electronic Filing and Service Rules.

Law Journals and Reviews

A Piece of Mind for Peace of Mind: Federal Discoverability
of Opinion Work Product Provided to Expert Witnesses and Its Implications in
Hawai‘i. 24 UH L. Rev. 859 (2002).

Electronic Discovery: A Call for a New Rules Regime for the Hawai‘i
Courts. 32 UH L. Rev. 153 (2009).

Case Notes

Reasonable compliance with a rule must be required. 20 H. 39
(1910); 24 H. 711, 713 (1919); 29 H. 802, 803 (1927).

The responsibility of the court to require such compliance is
secondary to the duty of the court to maintain the integrity of stipulations
approved by and filed with the court. 24 H. 655, 657 (1919).

Family court rules have force and effect of law. 61 H. 167,
598 P.2d 176 (1979).

Cited: 48 H. 290, 300, 401 P.2d 449 (1965).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next